Vermont, session 2025-2026, H190.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND FINDINGS
(a) The majority of Vermont’s laws on prostitution were adopted more than
100 years ago and have remained largely unchanged since that time.
(b) Under current Vermont law, the term “prostitution” includes “the
offering or receiving of the body for sexual intercourse for hire and shall also
be construed to include the offering or receiving of the body for indiscriminate
sexual intercourse without hire.”
VT LEG #379995 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.190
2025 Page 2 of 4
(c) These laws reflect the social mores of the early 1900s, criminalizing not
only voluntary sex work but sexual activity outside marriage, and no longer
reflect Vermont’s commitment to personal and bodily autonomy.
(d) Data has consistently shown that the criminalization of voluntary sex
work is associated with increased risk of sexual and physical violence from
clients, domestic partners, or other parties; increased risk of HIV and other
sexually transmitted infections; and a disruption of sex workers’ support
networks, workplace safety, and risk reduction strategies, resulting in reduced
physical and emotional health for sex workers.
(e) A 2018 Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health meta-
analysis reviewed over 130 studies conducted over 30 years, synthesizing
evidence on the extent to which sex work laws and policing practices affect sex
workers’ safety, health, and access to services, and the pathways through
which these effects occur. The study concluded “the qualitative and
quantitative evidence demonstrate the extensive harms associated with
criminalization of sex work, including laws and enforcement targeting the sale
and purchase of sex, and activities relating to sex work organization. There is
an urgent need to reform sex-work-related laws and institutional practices so as
to reduce harms and barriers to the realization of health.”
(f) It is the intent of the General Assembly to repeal the laws prohibiting
“indiscriminate” sex and voluntary sex work between consenting adults while
VT LEG #379995 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.190
2025 Page 3 of 4
retaining strict prohibitions and criminal penalties for human trafficking of
persons for sex work.
(g)(1) Pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 60, it is illegal to:
(A) recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or obtain by any means
a person under 18 years of age for the purpose of having the person engage in a
commercial sex act;
(B) recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or obtain any person
through force, fraud, or coercion for the purpose of having the person engage
in a commercial sex act or compel any person through force, fraud, or coercion
to engage in a commercial sex act; and
(C) patronize a person under 18 years of age for a commercial sex act
or patronize any person for a commercial sex act who is being compelled
through force, fraud, or coercion to engage in a commercial sex act.
(2) “Coercion” as it applies to compelling a person to engage in a
commercial sex act means:
(A) the threat of serious harm, including physical or financial harm to
or physical restraint against any person;
(B) any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to cause a person to believe
that failure to perform an act would result in serious bodily or financial harm to
or physical restraint of any person;
VT LEG #379995 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.190
2025 Page 4 of 4
(C) the abuse or threatened abuse of law or the legal process;
(D) withholding, destroying, or confiscating any actual or purported
passport, immigration document, or any other government identification
document of another person;
(E) providing a drug, including alcohol, to another person with the
intent to impair the person’s judgment or maintain a state of chemical
dependence;
(F) wrongfully taking, obtaining, or withholding any property of
another person;
(G) blackmail;
(H) asserting control over the finances of another person;
(I) debt bondage; or
(J) withholding or threatening to withhold food or medication.
(h) Penalties for offenses relating to human trafficking range from a
maximum of five years imprisonment (facilitation of human trafficking) to a
mandatory 20 years to life imprisonment (aggravated trafficking).
Sec. 2. REPEAL
13 V.S.A. chapter 59, subchapter 2 (prostitution) is repealed.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379995 v.1